Utah statutes.
31A-27a-118.   Commissioner's reports.

(1)  The commissioner shall include in the commissioner's annual report:

(a)  the names of the insurers proceeded against under Sections 31A-27a-207 and 31A-27a-901;

(b)  those facts which indicate in reasonable detail the commissioner's formal proceedings under this chapter; and

(c)  those facts which generally explain the use and effectiveness of proceedings under Chapter 27, Part 5, Administrative Actions, and Section 31A-27a-901.

(2)  The commissioner as receiver shall make and file annual reports and any other required reports for an insurer proceeded against under Sections 31A-27a-207 and 31A-27a-901 in the manner, in the form, and within the time required by law of an insurer authorized to do business in this state.

